Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3832
(UTC 406) Creation of trust induced by fraud, duress, or undue influence.

(UTC 406) A trust is void to the extent its creation was induced by fraud, duress, or undue influence.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 32.